New Jersey, session 221, S1830.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  There is established in the Department of Law and Public Safety the Automotive Anti-Theft Systems Task Force. The purpose of the task force shall be to study and make recommendations for manufacturers and dealers concerning motor vehicle design features and products meant to prevent theft of motor vehicles and motor vehicle parts. b.    The task force shall consist of 16 members as follows: (1) the Attorney General, who shall serve ex officio, or a designee; (2) the Commissioner of the Department of Banking and Insurance, who shall serve ex officio, or a designee; (3) two representatives of the Auto Theft Task Force in the Division of State Police selected by the Superintendent of State Police; (4) one representative of each of the following organizations selected by that organization: the New Jersey Manufacturing Extension Program; the New Jersey Coalition of Automotive Retailers; the Alliance for Automotive Innovation; the New Jersey Gasoline-Convenience-Automotive Association; the AAA Clubs of New Jersey; the National Insurance Crime Bureau; the Insurance Council of New Jersey; and the New Jersey Fraternal Order of Police; and (5) four public members, appointed by the Governor, with experience in automotive manufacturing. c.     Appointments to the task force shall be made no later than 30 days following the effective date of P.L.   , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill). Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. The members of the task force shall serve without compensation, but shall be eligible for reimbursement for necessary and reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties within the limits of funds appropriated or otherwise made available to the task force for its purposes. d.    The task force shall organize as soon as practicable following the appointment of its public members and shall select a chairperson from among its members, as well as a secretary who need not be a member of the task force. The task force may meet and hold hearings at the place or places the task force designates. The Department of Law and Public Safety shall provide staff support to the task force. The task force shall be entitled to call to its assistance and avail itself of the services of the employees of any State, county, or municipal department, board, bureau, commission, or agency as the task force may require and as may be available to the task force for its purposes. e.     No later than six months after its organization the task force shall prepare and submit to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature a report detailing the task force's recommendations concerning improvements in motor vehicle theft prevention measures through motor vehicle design features and product availability. The report shall include any recommendations for legislative or regulatory action that are necessary to effectuate the improvements.  The task force shall expire upon submission of its written report. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately, and shall expire upon submission of the task forces written report to the Governor and the Legislature, as provided by section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill).